Maryland, session 2026, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1013*

HOUSE BILL 1013
4–401.
(a) The purpose of the county board is to:
(1) Maintain throughout the county a reasonably uniform system of public
schools that is designed to provide quality education and equitable educational opportunity
for all children;
(2) Raise the level of academic achievement of the students in the Prince
George’s County public school system; and
(3) Raise the level of engagement of the parents, students, and community
as a whole.
4–402.
(a) In addition to the other powers granted to, and duties imposed on, a county
superintendent under this article, the County Superintendent has the responsibilities and
powers set forth in this section.
(b) The County Superintendent shall be responsible for:
(2) Subject to the provisions of Title 6 of this article, and after a budget is
submitted by the county board and approved by the County Council at the beginning of
each fiscal year, the day–to–day management and oversight of the fiscal affairs of the
Prince George’s County public school system, including the management of activities
related to:
(iii) Instructional salaries;
(vi) Special education;
4–406.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY BOARD AND COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL INCLUDE FUNDS IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET TO PROVIDE EACH INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED AS A ONE–TO–ONE
STUDENT AIDE FULL–TIME SALARY AND BENEFITS, INCLUDING HEALTH INSURANCE
AND OTHER FRINGE BENEFITS REGULARLY PROVIDED TO FULL–TIME EMPLOYEES,
UNDER THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS EXTENDED TO OTHER EMPLOYEES OF
THE COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 1013 3
(C) (1) THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT, OR THE COUNTY
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE, SHALL PROVIDE QUARTERLY UPDATES ON SPECIAL
EDUCATION IN THE COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM TO THE COUNTY BOARD AND THE
DEPARTMENT FOR AT LEAST 24 MONTHS.
(2) THE QUARTERLY UPDATES REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING CONTENT:
(I) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS IN THE COUNTY SCHOOL
SYSTEM WITH AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM THAT REQUIRE
ONE–TO–ONE STUDENT AIDES AND THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS IMPACTED;
(II) THE NUMBER AND PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS OWED
COMPENSATORY SERVICES AND THE PERCENTAGE OF COMPENSATORY SERVICES
COMPLETED;
(III) THE PERCENTAGE OF INDIVIDUALIZED SERVICE MINUTES
FOR STUDENTS WITH INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAMS DELIVERED;
(IV) THE AVERAGE AND MAXIMUM DAYS THAT ONE–TO–ONE
STUDENT AIDE POSITIONS REMAIN UNFILLED; AND
(V) THE VACANCY AND TURNOVER RATES FOR ONE–TO–ONE
STUDENT AIDES.
(3) AFTER 24 MONTHS, THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT OR THE
COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE MAY CEASE CONDUCTING QUARTERLY
UPDATES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE DEPARTMENT
CERTIFIES SUSTAINED COMPLIANCE IN THE PROVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION
SERVICES FOR AT LEAST 2 CONSECUTIVE QUARTERS USING OBJECTIVE
PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS, INCLUDING:
(I) IEP SERVICE DELIVERY RATES;
(II) TIMELY FILING OF ONE–TO–ONE AIDE ASSIGNMENTS;
(III) COMPLETION OF COMPENSATORY SERVICES; AND
(IV) THE REDUCTION IN RECURRING COMPLAINTS AND DUE
PROCESS FILINGS.
(D) (1) (I) THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL DEVELOP AND
OFFER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TRAINING IN SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES

HOUSE BILL 1013
TO COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM EMPLOYEES WHO PROVIDE SPECIAL EDUCATION
SERVICES.
(II) THE TRAINING DEVELOPED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY BE OFFERED IN–PERSON OR VIRTUALLY AND
PROVIDED SYNCHRONOUSLY OR ASYNCHRONOUSLY; AND
2. SHALL BE OFFERED BY THE COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM
EACH QUARTER OF THE SCHOOL YEAR.
(2) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH EMPLOYEE
WHO PROVIDES SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES IN THE COUNTY SCHOOL SYSTEM
SHALL COMPLETE AT LEAST ONE TRAINING OFFERED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION EACH SCHOOL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “IDEA” means the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
(3) “IEP” means an individualized education program.
(b) The State Department of Education shall contract with a third–party auditor
to conduct an audit of the Department of Special Education in Prince George’s County
Public Schools for fiscal years 2021 through 2025.
(c) The audit required under subsection (b) of this section shall include
performance, compliance, and financial data regarding special education services provided
to students in the local school system under the supervision of the Department of Special
Education in Prince George’s County Public Schools that addresses:
(1) delivery of special education services and compliance with IDEA,
including:
(i) the number of students with an IEP requiring a one–to–one
student aide;
(ii) totals by month;
(iii) the assignment status;
(iv) the duration of unfilled assignments;

HOUSE BILL 1013 5
(v) coverage offered by substitutes; and
(vi) compensatory services required under IDEA due to missed or
insufficient services;
(2) complaints and due process filings involving students in the Prince
George’s County public school system, including:
(i) a 5–year inventory of State complaints, local complaints,
mediation, and due process filings;
(ii) resolution timelines;
(iii) corrective actions taken; and
(iv) a list of schools and departments within the Prince George’s
County public school system with recurring complaints and due process filings;
(3) staffing and workforce issues, including:
(i) vacancies and turnover rates;
(ii) the ratio of benefit–eligible aides versus temporary aides; and
(iii) training hours;
(4) finance and procurement issues, including:
(i) a 5–year trend of the special education budget and actual
spending;
(ii) lapses and underspending; and
(iii) the use of vacancies to balance budgets; and
(5) special education student outcomes, including:
(i) the impact of missed services on progress toward IEP goals;
(ii) graduation or alternate assessment participation rates;
(iii) chronic absenteeism rates; and
(iv) discipline for students with disabilities.
(d) (1) The third–party auditor shall have access to relevant files to carry out
this section.

HOUSE BILL 1013
(2) The State Department of Education and the Department of Special
Education in Prince George’s County Public Schools shall publish, in a prominent location
on their respective websites, each report, corrective action and strategic plan, and quarterly
update required under subsection (f)(3) of this section, subject to the requirements of the
Public Information Act.
(e) (1) The Prince George’s County public school system shall designate a
compliance liaison to produce records within the timelines described in subsection (f) of this
section.
(2) If the Prince George’s County public school system fails to comply with
the records production requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the school system:
(i) shall be required to appear before the Prince George’s County
Council and the Prince George’s County Board of Education;
(ii) may have funds withheld by the State Superintendent of Schools
in accordance with §§ 2–303 and 5–205 of the Education Article; or
(iii) shall have mandatory corrective actions monitored by the State
Department of Education.
(f) (1) The third–party auditor shall submit various reports on the audit
required under subsection (c) of this section to the State Department of Education.
(2) The State Department of Education shall compile and distribute the
reports on the audit to:
(i) the Prince George’s County Council;
(ii) the Prince George’s County Executive;
(iii) the Prince George’s County Board of Education;
(iv) the Prince George’s County Superintendent of Schools; and
(v) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly.
(3) The reports required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted as follows:
(i) on or before 90 days from the effective date of this Act, a baseline
report with compliance risks under IDEA and relevant State regulations, including
preliminary findings on special education aide assignments and missed services and
preliminary priority recommendations;

HOUSE BILL 1013 7
(ii) on or before 180 days from the effective date of this Act, a final
comprehensive report of the information required under subsection (c) of this section that
includes:
1. an analysis of special education services delivery, staffing,
finance, procurement, and governance issues;
2. school–level and central–office findings; and
3. heatmaps that identify chronic noncompliance; and
(iii) on or before 30 days from the date of submission of the report
under item (ii) of this paragraph, in consultation with the State Department of Education
and the Prince George’s County public school system, a corrective action and strategic plan
with:
1. quantifiable metrics;
2. a staffing plan;
3. a parent engagement plan, written in plain language with
multilingual access, including IEP meeting supports; and
4. technology requirements and innovative solutions to
provide transparency on the progress, including centralized special education
services–tracking dashboards, automated vacancy alerts to IEP teams, and a parent portal
with multilingual access that displays special education services delivery compared to
student IEP goals.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years from the date it is enacted and, at
the end of the 3–year period, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.